District of Columbia statutes.
2-1209.05

Services.

(a)

Selected basic services shall be included in the rent for the business incubator; other services shall be paid for on an as-used basis.

(b)

The only free services shall be those ordinarily available free of charge from participating providers.

(c)

Services available elsewhere shall not be duplicated; all existing management support and services programs in the District, including financial services, shall be utilized.

(d)

Both public and private resources may be made available to tenant businesses.

Dec. 12, 1985, D.C. Law 6-71, § 6, 32 DCR 6334

History

1981 Ed., § 1-2235.

Prior Codifications